California, session 20252026, AB530.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 89765) is added to Chapter 6 of Part 55 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 4.5. The California State University Transparency Act of 202589765. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California State University Transparency Act of 2025.89765.5. For purposes of this article, “expenditure of state funds” means the expenditure or transfer of any state funds by the California State University in an amount that exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in the form of, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(a) Grants.(b) Contracts.(c) Subcontracts.(d) Purchase orders.(e) Investments.89766. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the California State University shall include on its internet website, accessible to the public at no cost, and in a manner that allows the public to search and aggregate information on the expenditure of state funds, all of the following:(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), for each expenditure of state funds, information on the expenditure that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:(i) The name and address of each office or business entity that receives funds, or other fund recipient. The information disclosed pursuant to this subparagraph shall not include the name of an individual person.(ii) The amount of the expenditure.(iii) The type of transaction.(iv) The identity of the department, office, or other entity of the California State University making the expenditure.(v) The program and type of expenditure.(vi) A description of the purpose of the expenditure.(vii) A description of any item purchased pursuant to the expenditure.(viii) Any other information deemed relevant by the Department of Finance or the Governor’s office.(B) For each expenditure that is a transfer of state funds in the form of investments, information on the investments that includes only the total amount of the transfer and the source of the funds.(2) The capability for a user to view information on the internet website in a format that is searchable and the capability for a user to download and manage that information with appropriate software.(3) The capability for a user to give input to the California State University regarding the utility of the information.(4) The capability for a user to give recommendations to the California State University for improvements to the manner in which the information is provided on the internet website.(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the California State University’s internet website shall include information on the expenditure of state funds for the 2026–27 fiscal year. On and after July 1, 2027, the internet website shall be updated monthly to include information on the expenditure of state funds for the most recently completed month.(c) The California State University shall fully cooperate with the Department of Finance and the Governor’s office in compiling and providing all information necessary to comply with this section.(d) This section does not require the disclosure of confidential information or the disclosure of information that is otherwise exempt from disclosure under state or federal law.